West Virginia, session 2026, SB590.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: article 8a.  preparation, distribution, or exhibition of obscene material to minors. §61-8A-2a. Prohibiting presence of minors at adult-oriented performances; penalties. (a) It is a criminal offense for a person to engage in an adult cabaret performance:(1) On public property; or (2) In a location where the adult cabaret performance could be viewed by a person who is a minor. (b) Notwithstanding any other provision of code to the contrary, this section expressly preempts an ordinance, regulation, restriction, or license that was lawfully adopted or issued by a political subdivision prior to or after the effective date of this code section.(c) As used in this section, "adult cabaret performance" means a performance in a location other than an adult cabaret that features topless dancers, go-go dancers, exotic dancers, strippers, male or female impersonators who provide entertainment that appeals to the prurient interest, or similar entertainers, regardless of whether performed for consideration.(d) A person who knowingly and intentionally violates subsection (a) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not more than $2,500, or confined in jail not less than 30 days nor more than six months, or both fined and confined. (e) A person who is convicted of a second offense under subsection (a) of this section, shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, shall be fined not more than $25,000 or imprisoned in a state correctional facility for not less than one nor more than five years, or both fined and imprisoned. Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home